Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [136A.045] RESTRICTING STATE MONEY FOR LOW-EARNING DEGREE PROGRAMS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, a "low-earning degree program" means a program that has lost eligibility to receive federal money under United States Code, title 20, section 1087d(c). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin State money restricted. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner must not allocate or expend state money under any program administered by the Office of Higher Education to directly or indirectly support a low-earning degree program. This prohibition applies to: new text end new text begin (1) student financial aid programs, including but not limited to programs under sections 136A.091 to 136A.1465; new text end new text begin (2) student loan programs and loan repayment programs, including but not limited to programs under sections 136A.15 to 136A.1796; and new text end new text begin (3) programs providing state money to institutions, including any grant programs. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Public information; legislative report. new text end new text begin (a) At least annually, the commissioner must review federal determinations of low-earning degree programs. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must maintain on the Office of Higher Education's public website a list of all current low-earning degree programs at postsecondary institutions located in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (c) By February 15 each year, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over higher education finance and policy, including, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) the current list of low-earning degree programs at postsecondary institutions located in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) information about enforcement and implementation of this section by the Office of Higher Education; and new text end new text begin (3) the estimated amount of state money saved, reallocated, or redirected away from low-earning degree programs as a result of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Rules. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall develop policies and adopt rules as necessary to implement this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end